Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.076

Transferring stolen pet animal to a research institution by a U.S.D.A. licensed dealer—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a U.S.D.A. licensed dealer to receive with intent to sell, or sell or transfer directly or through a third party, to a research institution in the state of Washington, a pet animal that the dealer knows or has reason to know has been stolen or fraudulently obtained.

(2) A conviction under this section is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and by a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars per pet animal.

[ 2003 c 53 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.